es: Forma de ambientador: Cartas; Gel; Aceite; Aerosol; Clip de ventilación; Otros
pt-BR: Formulação do aromatizador: Cartões; Gel; Óleo; Spray; Clipe de ventilação; Outro
it: Formato del deodorante per ambienti: Carte; Gel; Olio; Spray; Profumo clip; Altro
ja: 消臭・芳香剤の形態: カード; ゲル; オイル; スプレー; ベントクリップ; その他
lt-LT: Oro gaiviklio pavidalas: Kortelės; Gelis; Aliejus; Purškiklis; Tvirtinamas prie ventiliatoriaus grotelių; Kita
tr: Oda spreyi formu: Kartlar; Jel; Yağ; Sprey; Havalandırma klipsi; Diğer
pl: Forma odświeżacza powietrza: Karty; Żel; Ropa naftowa; Natrysk; Zacisk odpowietrzający; Inne
ko: 방향제 형태: 카드; 젤; 오일; 스프레이; 벤트 클립; 기타
bg-BG: Вид на освежителя за въздух: Карти; Гел; Масло; Спрей; Скоба за отдушник; Други
th: รูปแบบน้ำหอมปรับอากาศ: การ์ด; เจล; น้ำมัน; สเปรย์; คลิปหนีบช่องแอร์; อื่นๆ
hu: Légfrissítő formája: Lapok; Gél; Olaj; Spray; Felcsíptethető légfrissítő; Egyéb
sv: Form av luftfräschare: Kort; Gel; Olja; Spray; Ventilklämma; Övrigt
fr: Forme de désodorisant: Cartes; Gel; Huile; Vaporisateur; Clip de ventilation; Autre
zh-CN: 空气清新剂形式: 卡片; 发胶; 润滑油; 喷雾; 通气管夹; 其他
cs: Forma osvěžovače vzduchu: Karty; Gel; Olej; Sprej; Větrací klip; Jiné
de: Form des Lufterfrischers: Karten; Gel; Öl; Spray; Lüftungsclip; Sonstiges
nb: Luftfriskerform: Kort; Gel; Olje; Spray; Ventilklips; Annet
el: Μορφή αρωματισμένου αποσμητικού χώρου: Κάρτες; Τζελ; Έλαιο; Σπρέι; Αρωματικό αεραγωγού; Άλλο
hr-HR: Oblik osvježivača zraka: Kartice; Gel; Ulje; Sprej; Kopča za otvor ventilacije; Ostalo
fi: Ilmanraikastimen olomuoto: Kortit; Geeli; Öljyt; Suihke; Tuuletusklipsi; Muu
da: Luftfriskerform: Kort; Gel; Olie; Spray; Ventilationsclips; Andet
ru: Тип ароматизатора: Пластинки; Гель; Масло; Спрей; Подвесной ароматизатор; Другое
zh-TW: 空氣清新劑形式: 卡片; 凝膠; 油; 噴霧; 出風口夾; 其他
en: Air freshener form: Cards; Gel; Oil; Spray; Vent clip; Other
sk-SK: Forma osviežovača vzduchu: Karty; Gél; Olej; Sprej; Odvzdušňovacia svorka; Iné
vi: Dạng bộ lọc không khí: Thẻ, bài; Gel; Dầu; Dạng xịt; Kẹp lỗ thông; Khác
pt-PT: Forma de ambientador: Cartões; Gel; Óleo; Pulverizador; Clipe de ventilação; Outro
ro-RO: Formă odorizant: Cartonașe; Gel; Ulei; Spray; Pentru grila de ventilație; Altele
sl-SI: Oblika osvežilca zraka: Kartice; Gel; Olje; Razpršilo; S sponko; Drugo
nl: Vorm luchtverfrisser: Kaarten; Gel; Olie; Spray; Ventilatieclip; Andere